Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB481.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 217.2202 is amended to read as follows:
A kratom processor or kratom retailer shall not:
(1) Distribute, dispense, sell, or make available for sale any kratom extract or kratom
product to an individual who is under twenty-one (21) years of age; or
(2) Prepare, manufacture, distribute, dispense, sell, or make available for sale any
kratom extract or kratom product that:
(a) Is adulterated with a dangerous nonkratom substance that affects the quality
or strength of the kratom extract or kratom product to such a degree that it
may injure a consumer;
(b) Contains a poisonous or otherwise harmful nonkratom ingredient, including
but not limited to any controlled substance as defined in KRS Chapter 218A;
(c) [Contains a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction that is
greater than two percent (2%) of the overall alkaloid composition of the
product;
(d) ]Contains any synthetic alkaloid, including synthetic mitragynine, synthetic 7-
hydroxymitragynine, or any other synthetically derived compound of the plant
Mitragyna speciosa;
(d)[(e)] Contains levels of residual solvents higher than those permitted under
the United States Pharmacopeia Chapter 467; or
(e)[(f)] Does not meet the labeling requirements established pursuant to KRS
217.2203 or any administrative regulation promulgated thereunder.
Section 2. KRS 217.2203 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All kratom extracts and kratom products sold or otherwise distributed in the
Commonwealth shall be accompanied by a clear label that provides adequate
information for safe and effective use by consumers that includes but is not limited
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1423
to:
(a)[(1)] A list of the ingredients used in the manufacturing of the kratom extract
or kratom product;
(b)[(2)] The amount of mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine contained in the
kratom extract or kratom product;
(c)[(3)] The recommended serving size of the kratom extract or kratom product;
(d)[(4)] The number of servings per container of the kratom extract or kratom
product;
(e)[(5)] The name and principle street address of the vendor or person
responsible for distributing the kratom extract or kratom product;
(f)[(6)] Any precautionary statements as to the safety and effectiveness of the
kratom extract or kratom product; and
(g)[(7)] A disclaimer that the kratom extract or kratom product is not intended to
diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent any medical condition or disease.
(2) Any product that contains a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid
fraction that is greater than two percent (2%) of the overall alkaloid composition
of the product shall comply with the labeling requirements established in
subsection (1) of this section but shall not be labeled or marketed as a kratom
product or contain any reference or indication on its packaging that it is a kratom
product.
(3) Processors and retailers of any product described in subsection (2) of this section
shall comply with Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. KRS 217.2205 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to implement KRS 217.2202, 217.2203, and 217.2207.
(2) Administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall apply to
products that contain a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:30 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1423
that is greater than two percent (2%) of the overall alkaloid composition of the
product except that those administrative regulations shall not require those
products to be labeled as a kratom product or as containing kratom extracts.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/7/2025 4:30 PM Jacketed